Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.715

Scope.

An adult with a disability may voluntarily, without undue influence or coercion, enter into a supported decision-making agreement with a supporter under which the adult with a disability authorizes the supporter to do any or all of the following:

(1) Provide supported decision making, including assistance in understanding the options, responsibilities, and consequences of the adult's life decisions, without making those decisions on behalf of the adult with a disability;

(2) Assist the adult in accessing, collecting, and obtaining information that is relevant to a given life decision, including medical, psychological, financial, educational, or treatment records, from any person;

(3) Assist the adult with a disability in understanding the information described in subsection (2) of this section; and

(4) Assist the adult in communicating the adult's decisions to appropriate persons.

[ 2020 c 312 s 604.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.